Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 6 Retirement, Retirement Allowances, and Death Benefits

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of General Applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Legislative Retirement System, Chapter 513-3-1.

47-6-80.
Eligibility and application for a retirement allowance; early retirement; monthly retirement allowance; amount of retirement allowance; compliance with federal tax laws; increases in retirement allowance.

Upon the written application to the board, any member of the system who (1) has attained age 65 and has completed eight or more years of creditable service or (2) has attained age 62 and has completed eight or more years of membership service shall be retired by the board on a retirement allowance and shall thereupon become a beneficiary of the system, provided that he is no longer in the service of the state, whether as a member of the General Assembly or otherwise. In lieu of eight years of service, a member may substitute four terms of office in the General Assembly.

The effective date of retirement shall be the first day of the month in which the application is received by the board, but such effective date shall not, in any case, be earlier than the first day of the month following the final month of the applicant’s employment. Applications for retirement shall not be accepted more than 90 days in advance of the effective date of retirement.

Normal retirement age for a member with at least eight years of membership service shall be the date the member has reached 62 years of age. Normal retirement age for a member with less than eight years of membership service but with at least eight years of creditable service shall be the date the member has reached 65 years of age. Any member of the system who has completed eight or more years of membership service and who has attained age 60 may elect to retire prior to age 62, provided that in such event, the member’s retirement allowance shall be reduced by 5 percent for each year below age 62.

(c.1)

In lieu of the monthly service retirement allowance provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, for any person who was a contributing member on January 1, 2022, or who first becomes a contributing member after January 1, 2022, upon retirement under subsection (a) of this Code section such member shall receive a monthly service retirement allowance equal to the sum of $50.00 for each year of such member’s creditable service and an additional $200.00 for each year of such member’s presiding creditable service. Any inactive or retired member who was not a contributing member on January 1, 2022, and who becomes a contributing member again after January 1, 2022, shall be eligible for the monthly service retirement allowance provided in this subsection for his or her membership service earned after January 1, 2022.

Upon such retirement under subsection (a) of this Code section, the retired member shall receive a monthly service retirement allowance which shall be equal to $28.00 multiplied by the number of years of the member’s creditable service.

(d.1)

The board of trustees is authorized to provide for the payment of benefits to members or beneficiaries of the retirement system at a time and under circumstances not provided for in this chapter to the extent that such payment is required to maintain the retirement system as a qualified retirement plan for purposes of federal income tax laws and regulations.

Any increase in benefits payable under the retirement system which becomes effective as a result of a change in the benefit formula provided for by subsection (d) of this Code section shall be applicable to beneficiaries of the system who are receiving benefits at the time the increase becomes effective.

Subject to the terms and limitations of this Code section, the board of trustees is authorized to adopt from time to time a method or methods of providing for increases in the retirement allowance provided in subsection (d) of this Code section for persons theretofore or thereafter retiring under this article. Such method shall be based upon:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board of trustees;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant;

provided, however, that any such increase shall be uniform and shall apply equally to all members of this retirement system.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, no member who becomes a member of this retirement system on or after July 1, 2009, shall be entitled to receive any postretirement benefit adjustment.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 6; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1354, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 930, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 931, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 611, § 3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1255, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 510, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1277, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 320, § 3/HB 452; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 26/HB 202; Ga. L. 2013, p. 688, § 1/SB 178; Ga. L. 2022, p. 218, § 4/HB 824.

The 2009 amendments.

The first 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, added subsection (g). The second 2009 amendment, effective May 11, 2009, in subsection (c), added the first two sentences and substituted “the member’s” for “his” near the end of the last sentence.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added subsection (d.1).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added subsection (c.1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 320, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly is desirous of providing an established annual cost-of-living adjustment to all current active and retired members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, the Georgia Legislative Retirement System, and the Georgia Judicial Retirement System. In order to do so, limiting future liability of the systems by adjusting the retirement expectations of persons who are newly employed is a regrettable but necessary step toward fiscal soundness.”

47-6-81.
Optional retirement allowances.

Until the first payment on account of the retirement allowance becomes normally due, any beneficiary may elect, by filing written application with the board, to convert the retirement allowance otherwise payable on his account after retirement into a retirement allowance of equivalent actuarial value under one of the optional forms named below:

Option One shall consist of a reduced retirement allowance payable during the beneficiary’s life, with the provision that the reduced allowance shall continue after his death to and for the life of the contingent beneficiary designated by him in such application, if such contingent beneficiary survives him; and

Option Two shall consist of a reduced retirement allowance payable during the beneficiary’s life, with the provision that one-half of the reduced allowance shall continue after his death to and for the life of the contingent beneficiary designated by him in such application, if such contingent beneficiary survives him.

Any other provisions of this Code section or of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, the board of trustees may, by rule or regulation, require that when a member or a retired member dies and the beneficiary is a person other than the surviving spouse of the member, the benefits payable to the beneficiary shall be paid to the beneficiary within a definite time period immediately following the death of the member or retired member. For purposes of this Code section, the term “equivalent actuarial value” means a benefit of equivalent value when computed upon the bases of the mortality tables and rates of interest adopted for such purpose by the board of trustees.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 7; Ga. L. 1984, p. 810, § 4; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 20/HB 460; Ga. L. 2006, p. 93, § 1/SB 466.

47-6-82.
Manner in which retirement allowances to be paid; termination of payments upon death.

All retirement allowances shall be paid in monthly installments and shall cease with the month in which the death of the beneficiary occurs, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 47-6-81.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 8; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 21/HB 460.

47-6-83.
Payments made upon the death of a member, upon death of a beneficiary who has not elected an optional retirement allowance, or upon death of a member before retirement.

Upon the death of any member of the system, a lump sum amount shall be paid to such person as he has nominated by written designation, filed with the board, otherwise to his estate. Such lump sum amount shall be equal to the amount of his accumulated contributions.

Upon the death of a beneficiary who has not elected an optional form of allowance under Code Section 47-6-81, a lump sum amount shall be paid to such person as he has last nominated by written designation, filed with the board, otherwise to his estate. Such lump sum amount shall be equal to the excess, if any, of his accumulated contributions at the time his allowance commenced over the sum of the retirement allowance payments made to him.

Upon the death before retirement of a member of the system otherwise eligible for retirement or of a member with 15 years of creditable service, the person nominated by him to receive the lump sum amount in subsection (a) of this Code section shall receive, in lieu of such lump sum payment, an allowance for life in the same amount as if the deceased member had retired at the time of his death and had named such person as contingent beneficiary under Option One of Code Section 47-6-81. If the person nominated is not living at the death of the deceased member, the accumulated contributions shall be paid to the estate of the deceased member.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 10; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1354, § 3.

47-6-84.
Termination of retirement allowance upon return to service; retirement benefits for retired members returning to service in the General Assembly; board of trustees to be notified within 30 days if public employer employs retired plan member.

As used in this Code section, the term “public employer” means any branch of state government and any state agency, department, board, bureau, or other instrumentality. This term also includes the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia and any public school system, including, but not limited to, primary, secondary, and postsecondary institutions operated by local or independent boards of education that receive any funds from the State of Georgia or any agency thereof.

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, if any retired member returns to the service of a public employer in any position, including, without limitation, service directly or indirectly as or for an independent contractor, except as a member of the General Assembly, the member’s retirement allowance shall cease. Upon cessation of such service, the retired member, after proper notification to the board, shall receive the same retirement allowance which the member was receiving prior to returning to service of a public employer.

Notwithstanding any other provisions in this chapter to the contrary, the retirement allowance of a retired member who returns to the service of a public employer in any position, including, without limitation, service directly or indirectly as or for an independent contractor, other than as a member of the General Assembly shall not cease provided that such member performs no more than 1,040 hours of such service in any calendar year.

If a retired member returns to service as a member of the General Assembly after the member has reached normal retirement age, the retired member may either continue to receive a retirement benefit while serving as a member of the General Assembly or reestablish active membership in the retirement system. If the election is to reestablish active membership in the retirement system, the member shall have the same creditable service which the member possessed at the time of retirement and shall accumulate additional creditable service so long as such active membership continues. Except as otherwise provided by paragraph (2) of this subsection, a retired member who returns to service in the General Assembly shall make the election provided for in this paragraph within 30 days after taking office. Such election shall be made in writing to the board of trustees and shall be irrevocable. If a retired member returns to service as a member of the General Assembly before the member has reached normal retirement age, the retired member shall reestablish active membership in the retirement system. The member shall have the same creditable service which the member possessed at the time of retirement and shall accumulate additional creditable service so long as such active membership continues.

A retired member who returned to service in the General Assembly prior to the existence of the option to reestablish active membership in the retirement system shall have the right to make the election provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection at any time prior to January 1, 1991. In addition to creditable service provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection, any such retired member who elects to reestablish active membership in the retirement system may obtain creditable service for service in the General Assembly rendered from the time of returning to service in the General Assembly until the date of reestablishing active membership in the retirement system. In order to obtain such creditable service, the member shall pay to the board of trustees the employee contributions which would have been paid to the retirement system during the period for which such creditable service is claimed, plus regular interest thereon compounded annually from the time the service in the General Assembly was rendered until the date of payment.

Any public employer that employs a retired plan member shall within 30 days of the employee’s accepting employment notify the board of trustees in writing stating the name of the plan member and the number of hours the employee is expected to work annually and shall provide such other information as the board may request. Any employer that fails to notify the board of trustees as required by this subsection shall reimburse the retirement system for any benefits wrongfully paid. It shall be the duty of the retired plan member seeking employment by the employer to notify the employer of his or her retirement status prior to accepting such position. If a retired plan member fails to so notify the employer and the employer becomes liable to the retirement system, the plan member shall hold the employer harmless for all such liability.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 11; Ga. L. 1980, p. 611, § 5; Ga. L. 1990, p. 534, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2748, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 752, § 1/SB 98; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 27/HB 202; Ga. L. 2012, p. 663, § 3/HB 183; Ga. L. 2013, p. 688, § 2/SB 178.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, substituted “State Personnel Administration” for “State Merit System of Personnel Administration” at the end of paragraph (a)(2). The second 2009 amendment, effective May 11, 2009, rewrote subsection (a); and, in paragraph (b)(1), inserted “after the member has reached normal retirement age” near the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “so long” for “as long” near the end of the second sentence, and added the last two sentences. See the Code Commission note regarding the effect of these amendments.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added subsection (c).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added subsection (a); redesignated former subsections (a) and (b) as subsections (b) and (c), respectively; in paragraph (b)(1), substituted “returns to the service of a public employer” for “who has not yet reached normal retirement age returns to the service of the state” in the first sentence and substituted “to service of a public employer” for “to state service” in the last sentence; in paragraph (b)(2), deleted “who has reached normal retirement age or has not been employed by or rendered service for the state and” following “retired member” and substituted “a public employer” for “the state”; deleted former paragraph (c)(1), which read: “As used in this subsection, the term ‘public employer’ means any branch of state government and any state agency, department, board, bureau, or other instrumentality. This term also includes the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia and any public school system, including, but not limited to, primary, secondary, and postsecondary institutions operated by local or independent boards of education that receive any funds from the State of Georgia or any agency thereof.”; and redesignated former paragraph (c)(2) as present subsection (d).

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2009, p. 752, § 1, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 27. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

47-6-85.
Refund of accumulated contributions upon termination of membership.

Except as otherwise provided in Article 2 of Chapter 1 of this title, a member’s accumulated contributions shall be 100 percent vested and nonforfeitable at all times. Upon the request of a member who ceases to be a member of the system for reasons other than retirement or death, the member shall be paid the member’s accumulated contributions as soon as feasible after such request. If the member dies before payment has been made, the amount of the member’s accumulated contributions shall be paid to such person as the member has nominated by written designation filed with the board, otherwise to the member’s estate.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 9; Ga. L. 1980, p. 611, § 4; Ga. L. 1980, p. 925, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 28/HB 202.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 11, 2009, added the first sentence; and, throughout this Code section, substituted “the member” for “he” and substituted “the member’s” for “his”.